New Jersey, session 222, A4528.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 11 of P.L.1973, c.185 (C.13:19-11) is amended to read as follows: 11.  Notwithstanding the applicant's compliance with the criteria listed in section 10 of P.L.1973, c.185 (C.13:19-10), if the commissioner finds that the proposed development would violate or tend to violate the purpose and intent of [this act] P.L.1973, c.185 as specified in section 2 of P.L.1973, c.185 (C.13:19-2), or that the proposed development would materially contribute to an already serious and unacceptable level of environmental degradation or resource exhaustion, the commissioner may deny the permit application, or the commissioner may issue a permit subject to such conditions as the commissioner finds reasonably necessary to promote the public health, safety and welfare, to protect public and private property, wildlife and marine fisheries, and to preserve, protect and enhance the natural environment.  The construction and operation of a nuclear electricity generating facility shall, however, not be approved by the commissioner unless the commissioner finds that the proposed method for the storage or disposal of radioactive waste material to be produced or generated by the facility will be safe, conforms to standards established by the Nuclear Regulatory Commission, and will effectively remove danger to life and the environment from such waste material. (cf:  P.L.1993, c.190, s.12) 2. This act shall take effect immediately.